Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1444.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 41ASSOCIATION HEALTH PLANSSec.4101. Definitions.4102. Association requirements.4103. Association health plan coverage requirements.4104. Association health plan rate and premium requirements.4105. Health insurer association health plan filing requirements.4106. Regulations.4107. Enforcement.123456789101112131415161718 § 4101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affordable Care Act." The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148, 124 Stat. 119), together with the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152, 124 Stat. 1029), as amended."A ssociation." As follows: (1) A member-based organization of employer members composed of:(i) Employers in the same industry, trade or profession.(ii ) Employers that do not share the same industry, trade or profession to the extent permitted under regulations of the United States Department of Labor in relation to ERISA.(iii) Employers domiciled or residing in this Commonwealth.(2) The term does not include a union trust established under a collective bargaining agreement that makes available health care coverage to the union trust's members."Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Covered individual." As follows:(1) An individual on whose behalf a health insurer is obligated to pay covered health care expense benefits or provide health care services under a health insurance policy.( 2) The term includes a policyholder, certificate holder, subscriber, member, dependent or other individual who 20250HB1444PN1680 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is eligible to receive health care services under a health insurance policy."Employee." As follows:(1) An individual employed by an employer.(2) The term includes a sole proprietor to the extent permitted under regulations of the United States Department of Labor in relation to ERISA."Employer." As follows:(1) As defined in section 29 U.S.C. § 1002(5) (relating to definitions).(2) The term includes a sole proprietor to the extent permitted under regulations of the United States Department of Labor in relation to ERISA."Employer member." An employer that is a member of an association."ERISA." 29 U.S.C. Ch. 18 (relating to employee retirement income security program)."Health care service." A covered treatment, admission, procedure, medical supply or equipment or other service, including behavioral health, prescribed or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided by a health care provider to a covered individual under a health insurance policy."Health factor." An element related to an individual's physical or mental make-up, including:(1) Health status.(2) M edical condition. (3) Claims experience.(4) Receipt of health care.(5) Medical history.(6) Genetic information.20250HB1444PN1680 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence.(8) Disability."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) An insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by a health insurer that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services.( 2) The term does not include any of the following: (i) An accident only policy.( ii) A credit only policy. (iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A hospital indemnity policy.(ix) A dental only policy.(x) A vision only policy.(xi) A workers' compensation policy.(xii) An automobile medical payment policy.(xiii) A homeowners insurance policy.(xiv) A short-term limited duration policy.(xv) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Health insurer." An entity licensed by the department with accident and health authority to issue a health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:20250HB1444PN1680 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.( 2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Sole proprietor." An individual that:(1) has an ownership right in a trade or business, regardless of whether the trade or business is incorporated or unincorporated;(2) e arns wages or self-employment income from the trade or business; and(3) works at least 20 hours a week or 80 hours a month providing personal services to the trade or business or earns income from the trade or business that at least equals the cost of the health insurance policy issued to an association. § 4102. Association requirements.(a) Sponsor.--An association may not sponsor an association health plan in this Commonwealth unless the association:(1) Has been actively in existence for at least two years.(2) Was formed and is maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance.(3) Has a constitution and bylaws that provide the following:(i) Regular meetings not less than annually to further purposes of the employer members of the association.20250HB1444PN1680 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The collection of dues or solicitation of contributions from employer members of the association.(iii) Voting privileges and representation on the board governing the association by employer members of the association.(4) Is not organized by an insurer or a parent or subsidiary or affiliate of an insurer.(5) D oes not operate from offices of, and is not controlled by, an insurer or a parent or subsidiary or affiliate of an insurer.(6) Does not condition membership in the association on any health factor relating to an individual or a dependent of an individual.(7) Has a governing board to manage the association's offering of health care coverage. The following shall apply:(i) At least 75% of the governing board shall be comprised of employees of employer members of the association participating in the association health plan, with the remaining representatives designated by the association.(ii) The employees of employer members of the association participating in the association health plan shall nominate and, through an election where each employee is given a vote, elect members to serve on the governing board.(iii) The governing board shall act in a fiduciary capacity with respect to the association health plan managing it:(A) For the exclusive purpose of all of the following:20250HB1444PN1680 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) P roviding health care coverage to individuals enrolled in coverage under the association health plan.(II) Defraying expenses relating to administration of the association health plan.(B) With the care, skill, prudence and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person in a similar capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a similar character and with similar aims.(8) Complies with all applicable requirements of ERISA, including the requirements applicable to a plan sponsor, as that term is defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002(16)(B) (relating to definitions).(b) Availability of association health plan coverage.--(1) An association may not make association health plan coverage available unless the coverage:(i) Is through a fully insured health insurance policy issued by a health insurer to the association.(ii) Covers at least 51 lives of employees of employer members.(iii) Is available to all employees of employer members of the association regardless of any health factor relating to an employee of an employer member or a dependent of an employee.(iv) Is not available other than in connection with an employer member of the association.(2) Coverage under an association health plan may be available to a dependent of an employee of an employer member 20250HB1444PN1680 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at the option of the employer member.(3) A t the employee's option, an employee of an employer member of the association with coverage under an association health plan who terminates employment with that employer member, and within 63 days is employed by another employer member of the association, may remain covered under the association health plan.§ 4103. Association health plan coverage requirements.Association health plan coverage shall:(1) Be guaranteed issue and guaranteed renewable.(2) B e subject to the group market coverage requirements under the Affordable Care Act, including the prohibition against denying coverage based on a preexisting condition.(3) Comply with all coverage requirements applicable to a health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed to a group of 51 or more employees in this Commonwealth.(4) Provide essential health benefits, as specified in 42 U.S.C. § 18022 (relating to essential health benefits requirements), as contained in the benchmark plan currently in use in the Pennsylvania small group market as of the effective date of this section.(5) Provide a level of coverage that is designed to provide benefits that are actuarially equivalent to or greater than 60% of the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under the policy, as calculated in accordance with the requirements of the Affordable Care Act.§ 4104. Association health plan rate and premium requirements.(a) Calculation.--A health insurer shall calculate rates for an association health plan based on all of the employees who are enrolled in coverage under the policy as a single risk pool.20250HB1444PN1680 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Same industry, trade or profession.-- In the case of an association composed of employers in the same industry, trade or profession that does not include sole proprietors:(1) A health insurer shall calculate premiums for coverage under an association health plan based on the collective group experience of the employees who are enrolled in coverage under the policy.( 2) At the health insurer's election, the health insurer may vary premiums developed in accordance with paragraph (1) for each employer member by the collective group experience of the employees who are employed by that employer member.(c) Sole proprietors or not sharing same industry, trade or profession.--In the case of an association that includes sole proprietors or is composed solely of employers that do not share the same industry, trade or profession to the extent permitted under regulations of the United States Department of Labor in relation to ERISA:(1) A health insurer shall calculate premiums for coverage under an association health plan based on the collective group experience of the employees who are enrolled in coverage under the policy.( 2) (Reserved). § 4105. Health insurer association health plan filing requirements.(a) Form filing requirements.--A health insurer may not offer, issue or renew a health insurance policy to an association unless the health insurer files with the department:(1) Association documentation demonstrating the association's compliance with section 4102 (relating to association requirements).20250HB1444PN1680 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) F or approval in accordance with the provisions of the act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act, the policy form, which must comply with the requirements of section 4103 (relating to a ssociation health plan coverage requirements ). (b) R ate-filing requirement.--Notwithstanding the provisions of the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act, the rates for a policy issued to an association shall be filed with the department prior to use.(c) Exemptions.--The commissioner may exempt the association policy form or rate filings from the requirements of this section by transmitting notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The rate filing requirement under subsection (b) shall expire June 30, 2027.§ 4106. Regulations. The department may promulgate regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out this chapter.§ 4107. Enforcement.(a) Imposition.-- Upon satisfactory evidence of the violation of any section of this chapter by an insurer or any other person, one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the commissioner's discretion:(1) Suspension or revocation of the license of the offending insurer or other person.( 2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license to the offending insurer or other person.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this chapter.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful 20250HB1444PN1680 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation of this chapter.(b) Limitation.--(1) Fines imposed against an individual insurer under this chapter may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(2) Fines imposed against any other person under this chapter may not exceed $100,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c ) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this subsection are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. Violations of this chapter shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.(3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(d) A dministrative procedure.--The administrative provisions of this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under 20250HB1444PN1680 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph (2) are necessary to effectuate the addition of 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 41.(2) The following are repealed:(i) Section 621.2(a)(2) and (f)(3) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(ii) All other acts and parts of acts insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 41.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1444PN1680 - 12 - 12345678910